Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-9011
Failure to file own risk and solvency assessment
summary report; penalty.

Any insurer failing, without just cause, to timely file
its own risk and solvency assessment summary report as required in the Risk
Management and Own Risk and Solvency Assessment Act shall be required, after
notice and hearing, to pay a penalty of not to exceed two hundred dollars
for each day's delay. The maximum penalty under this section is ten thousand
dollars. The director may reduce the penalty if the insurer demonstrates to
the director that the imposition of the penalty would constitute a financial
hardship to the insurer. The director shall remit any penalties collected
under this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2014, LB700, § 11.